Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June,
30, 2026, the sum of Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to provide for or facilitate the
construction of needed HAZMAT facilities at an industrial park in
this state, in an effort to secure the health and safety of the
residents of the state located near and potentially impacted by
large-scale economic activity likely to occur at such an industrial
park.
Req. No. 10112 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June,
30, 2026, the sum of One Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars
($1,400,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to provide
for or facilitate the operation of needed HAZMAT facilities at an
industrial park in this state, in an effort to secure the health and
safety of the residents of the state located near and potentially
impacted by large-scale economic activity likely to occur at such an
industrial park.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10112 JM 01/12/25





Req. No. 10112 Page 2